Utah statutes.
58-20a-302.   Qualifications for licensure.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), an applicant for licensure as an
environmental health scientist shall:
(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;
(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;
(c)  be of good moral character;
(d)  hold a bachelor's degree from an accredited program in a university or
college, which degree includes completion of specific coursework as defined by
rule;
(e)  pass an examination as determined by division rule in collaboration with
the board; and
(f)  pass the Utah Law and Rules Examination for Environmental Health
Scientists administered by the division.
(2)  An applicant for licensure who is currently actively engaged in the
practice of environmental health science in Utah on July 1, 1995, and has been
practicing in Utah for at least three consecutive months immediately prior to
July 1, 1995, shall:
(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;
(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;
(c)  be of good moral character;
(d)  hold a bachelor's degree from an accredited program in a university or
college, which degree includes completion of specific coursework as defined by
rule;
(e)  pass the Utah Law and Rules Examination for Environmental Health
Scientists administered by the division; and
(f)  submit an affidavit from the applicant's immediate supervisor in the
applicant’s employment, attesting to the applicant's competence to practice
environmental health science.
(3)  An applicant for licensure as an environmental health scientist-in-
training shall:
(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;
(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;
(c)  be of good moral character;
(d)  hold a bachelor's degree from an accredited program in a university or
college, which degree includes completion of specific coursework as defined by
rule;
(e)  pass the Utah Law and Rules Examination for Environmental Health
Scientists administered by the division; and
(f)  present evidence acceptable to the division and the board that the
applicant, when licensed, will practice as an environmental health scientist-
in-training only under the general supervision of a supervising environmental
health scientist licensed under this chapter.
